District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(a)

(1)

“Agency” means the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency.

(2)

“Director” means the Director of the Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency.

(3)

“Program” means the Homeland Security Program created by § 7-2231.03.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 202
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794